Hawaii statutes.
§651-49 Only defendant's interest sold.
No sale by execution shall operate to convey a greater estate or interest in
the property sold, than the defendant in execution had at the time of sale; and
all such sales of property not belonging to the defendant shall subject the
officer to the private action of the purchaser, being afterwards deprived
thereof by the real owner. [CC 1859, §1027; RL 1925, §2451; RL 1935, §4152; RL
1945, §10179; RL 1955, §233-48; HRS §651-49]

Case Notes

Liability of plaintiff in execution when sheriff sells more
than the defendant's share. 2 H. 178 (1859).

Sheriff's deed conveys only interest of judgment debtor at
time of sale. 9 H. 27 (1893); 29 H. 364 (1926).

This section is in pari materia with §634-29, and a mortgage made
subsequent to attachment is void as against attaching creditor. 51 H. 164, 454
P.2d 116 (1969).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next